Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2104
Business development corporation; purposes.

The purposes of a business development corporation shall be only: (1) To promote, stimulate, develop, and advance the business prosperity and economic welfare of the State of Nebraska and its citizens; (2) to encourage and assist through loans, investments, or other business transactions the location of new business and industry in the state; (3) to rehabilitate and assist existing business and industry in this state; (4) to stimulate and assist in the expansion of any kind of business activity which would tend to promote business development and maintain the economic stability in this state, provide maximum opportunities for employment, encourage thrift, and improve the standard of living of the citizens of this state; (5) to cooperate and act in conjunction with other organizations, public or private, including the United States Small Business Administration, in the promotion and advancement of industrial, commercial, agricultural, and recreational development in this state; and (6) to provide financing for the promotion, development, and conduct of all kinds of business activity in this state.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 4, p. 303;

Laws 1973, LB 56, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1241, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 300, § 6.